Missouri, session 2026, SB1508.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 510.120, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 510.120,
to read as follows:
510.120. 1. During the period beginning January first
and ending June first of each year, or whenever the general
assembly is in session, there shall be an automatic stay of
all administrative and court proceedings in which any member
of the general assembly has filed a written notice with the
court or administrative hearing officer and with all parties
to the proceeding that the member is:
(1) [A necessary] Subpoenaed as a witness;
(2) A party to the action; or
(3) The initial attorney for any party or has filed an
entry of appearance as an attorney for any party more than
forty-five days prior to the filing of the written notice
under this subsection.
2. The stay created by this section shall apply to all
trials, motions, hearings, discovery responses, depositions,
responses to motions, docket calls, and any other
proceedings before any trial court or administrative
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1508 2
tribunal, including municipal courts. The stay shall also
apply to any order requiring the member to serve as a juror
whenever the general assembly is in session.
3. The stay created by this section shall not apply:
(1) If the member waives the protections of this stay
in the form of a written memorandum filed with the trial
court or administrative tribunal;
(2) To any proceedings under chapter 288;
(3) To any proceedings involving a request for
injunctive relief; [or]
(4) To any proceeding in which a member has been
subpoenaed as a witness but, for good cause shown by any
party to the proceeding, the trial court or administrative
tribunal quashes the subpoena;
(5) To any proceeding in which a member has been
ordered to serve as a juror but the order requiring the
member to serve as a juror is set aside; or
(6) To any proceeding in which the member is charged
with a felony or a class A misdemeanor.
4. The court of appeals shall have original
jurisdiction over any application for termination or
modification of the stay.
5. In all civil cases or administrative proceedings or
in criminal cases pending in this state at any time when the
general assembly is in veto session, special session, or
holding out-of-session committee hearings, it shall be a
sufficient cause for such continuance if [it shall appear to
the court], by written notice, [that] any individual
subpoenaed as a witness, any individual ordered to serve as
a juror, any party applying for such continuance, or any
attorney, solicitor or counsel of such party is a member of
either house of the general assembly, and in or scheduled to

SB 1508 3
be in actual attendance on the out-of-session committee
hearings, special session, or veto session of the same[, and
that the attendance of such party, attorney, solicitor or
counsel is necessary to a fair and proper trial or other
proceeding in such suit]; and on the filing of such notice
the court shall continue such suit and any and all motions
or other proceedings therein, of every kind and nature,
including the taking of depositions and discovery responses,
and thereupon no trial or other proceedings of any kind or
nature shall be had therein until the adjournment or recess
for three days or more of the special session or veto
session of the general assembly, nor for one day before or
after or the day of any out-of-session committee hearings,
provided however, in the case of a member subpoenaed as a
witness or ordered to serve as a juror, for good cause shown
by any party, the trial court or administrative tribunal may
quash the subpoena or set aside the order to serve as a
juror and no continuance shall be required. Such notice
shall be sufficient, if made within two days of the out-of-
session committee hearings, special session, or veto session
of the general assembly, showing that at the time of making
the same such witness, juror, party, attorney, solicitor or
counsel is scheduled to be in actual attendance upon such
out-of-session committee hearings, special session, or veto
session of the general assembly.
✓